Utah statutes.
67-1-8.1.   Executive Residence Commission -- Recommendations as to
restoration of executive residence.
(1)  The Legislature finds and declares that:
(a)  the state property known as the Kearns' mansion, the executive residence,
is an irreplaceable historic landmark possessing special and unique
architectural qualities that should be preserved; and
(b)  the deterioration that has taken place will continue unless remedial
restoration measures are undertaken.
(2) (a)  An Executive Residence Commission is established to make
recommendations to the Legislature for the budgeting of renovation, upkeep,
historical maintenance, and restoration of the executive residence.
(b)  The commission shall consist of three private citizens appointed by the
governor, all of whom have demonstrated an interest in historical
preservation.
(c)  The commission shall also consist of one assigned representative from the
Board of the Utah Arts Council, one from the Board of State History, one from
the building board, an interior designer selected by the Utah chapter of ASID,
and an architect selected by the Utah chapter of the AIA.
(3)  (a)  Except as required by Subsection (b), as terms of current commission
members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed
member to a four-year term ending on March 1.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (a), the governor shall,
at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to
ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered so that
approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.
(4) (a)  The governor shall appoint a chair from among the membership of the
commission.
(b)  Five members of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and either the
chair or two other members of the commission may call meetings of the
commission.
(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(6) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the commission at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
